District of Columbia statutes.
36-305.01

Statement of public policy.

This chapter shall constitute a statement of the public policy of the District of Columbia. The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed in order to effectively carry out the purposes of this chapter in the interests of the public health, safety, and welfare.

Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-123, § 6-401, 24 DCR 2371
1981 Ed., § 10-241.
1973 Ed., § 10-241.